North Dakota statutes. TITLE 65 Workforce Safety and Insurance
CHAPTER 65-03 Prevention of Injuries

65-03-01.
Jurisdiction of organization — Safety regulations — Enforcement.

The organization shall have full power and jurisdiction over, and the supervision of, every employment and place of employment subject to the provisions of this title, and whenever necessary adequately to enforce and administer this title, shall issue and enforce all necessary and proper rules and safety regulations. The organization may designate some suitable person to make inspections to determine if safety rules and regulations are being followed or complied with.

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 162, § 4; 1921, ch. 145, § 1; 1925, ch. 220, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 396a4; S.L. 1927, ch. 285, § 1; 1931, ch. 314, § 1; 1935, ch. 286, § 3; 1939, ch. 251, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 65-0301; 2003, ch. 561, § 3.

65-03-02.
Penalty for violation of safety rule or regulation — Fine — Penalty premium rating — Extension of time to comply.

Any employer who shall fail to comply with any reasonable safety rule or regulation made in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, within twenty days after notice from the organization or its authorized agent, shall be guilty of an infraction, and the organization may penalize the premium rating of the employer guilty of such violation in an amount not exceeding ten percent during the year or years in which such violation continues. Upon application and a proper and sufficient showing that the rule or regulation cannot be complied with within the twenty days herein specified, the organization may extend such time for such period as the facts in each case warrant, but not to exceed three months.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 285, § 1; 1931, ch. 314, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 65-0302; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 670; 2003, ch. 561, § 3.

65-03-03.
Mine foremen — Rules regarding. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 608, § 6.

65-03-04.
Safety programs — Continuing appropriation.

The organization shall create and operate work safety and loss prevention programs to protect the health of covered employees and the financial integrity of the fund, including programs promoting safety practices by employers and employees through education, training, consultation, grants, or incentives. As a term of award of a grant under this section, a recipient authorizes the organization to disclose the name of the award recipient and the amount of the award received. Any funds deposited in the workforce safety insurance fund are appropriated to the organization on a continuing basis for the purpose of funding the programs implemented under this section.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 555, § 2; 1999, ch. 553, § 7; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2003, ch. 565, § 3; 2005, ch. 604, § 1; 2009, ch. 608, § 3.

65-03-05.
Safety grant programs — Reporting requirements.

The organization shall compile data relating to grants issued under this chapter. The organization shall report biennially to the legislative council.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 608, § 4.

Effective Date.

This section became effective August 1, 2009.